Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1540
Fraudulent placement of ballot into ballot box; penalty.

Any person who fraudulently puts a ballot into the ballot box shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 439.